hw_foma/serbian.foma
define TDeletion t -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define UJReplacement [o v a | e v a] -> u j || _ "^" [ e m | e s h | e | e m o | e t e | u ];
define AReplacement e -> 0 || a  "^" _ ;
define IReplacement e -> 0 || i  "^" _ ;
define CleanUp "^" -> 0 ;

read lexc serbian.lexc
define Lexicon;

regex Lexicon .o. TDeletion .o. UJReplacement .o. AReplacement .o. IReplacement .o. CleanUp;
